Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 3 National Guard

30-3-1.
Composition and organization.

The national guard shall consist of such number of federally recognized general officers, officers, warrant officers, and enlisted persons, duly commissioned, warranted, or enlisted therein, including officers and enlisted persons of the staff corps and departments, and organized as to branch or arm of service into such federally recognized units, organizations, corps, departments, or otherwise as shall be authorized by the laws of the United States and the regulations issued thereunder.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 45; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-1

.

30-3-2.
Emergency increase.

The governor shall have power in case of war, insurrection, invasion, riot, public catastrophe or calamity, or imminent danger thereof, to increase the national guard beyond the maximum now established by law and to organize it with the proper officers, as the exigencies of the situation may require, if authorized by the laws of the United States.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 46; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-2

.

30-3-3.
Protection of designations.

During the absence of organizations of the national guard in the service of the United States, their designation shall not be given to, or used by, any other organization.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 47; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-3

.

30-3-4.
Personnel of disbanded organizations.

Whenever any organization of the national guard is disbanded, the personnel thereof shall be disposed of in accordance with regulations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 48; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-4

.

30-3-5.
Minimum strength of organizations.

The commissioned or enlisted strength of any organization of the national guard shall not, without the consent of the President, be reduced below the minimum that shall be prescribed therefor by the President.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 49; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-5

.

30-3-6.
Unit funds.

Each unit of the Rhode Island national guard will be allowed the sum of one dollar ($1.00) per enlisted person per year to enable purchase of various supplies for use of each unit; provided, however, that no part of this fund shall be used to pay dues or assessments in any club or association. The sums so allowed shall be based upon the average membership in the units for the year ending June 30th in each year. The amount shall be paid to the commanding officer of the respective unit on July 1 of each year and placed in the unit fund. Expenditures from this fund shall be audited by the next higher headquarters every three (3) months.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 164; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-6

.

30-3-7.
Appropriation for unit funds.

A sum to provide for §

30-3-6

is hereby annually appropriated, out of any money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated, to carry out the purpose of §

30-3-6

; and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of this sum upon his or her receipt of properly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2213, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-7

.

30-3-8.
Inactive national guard.

The inactive national guard shall consist of such headquarters, units, officers, and enlisted persons as are authorized and prescribed, administered, and governed pursuant to the laws of the United States and the regulations issued thereunder.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 50; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-8

.

30-3-9.
Qualifications of officers.

Commissioned officers and warrant officers of the national guard hereafter appointed shall be citizens of the United States, between the ages of eighteen (18) and sixty (60) years, who shall have successfully passed such tests as to their moral, physical, and professional fitness as shall be prescribed by the laws of the United States and the regulations issued thereunder and as may be prescribed by the governor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 55; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-9

; P.L. 1976, ch. 23, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 559, § 1.

30-3-10.
Appointment and assignment of officers.

The governor shall appoint, commission, and assign commissioned officers and shall appoint, warrant, and assign warrant officers of the national guard, upon the recommendation of the adjutant general.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 56; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-10

.

30-3-11.
Classes from which commissioned officers selected.

Persons hereafter commissioned as officers of the national guard shall be selected from the following classes:

Officers or enlisted persons of the national guard;

Officers, active or retired, reserve officers, and former officers of the United States army, air force, navy, marine corps, or coast guard, enlisted men and former enlisted persons of the United States army, air force, navy, marine corps, or coast guard who have received an honorable discharge therefrom;

Graduates of any of the United States military and naval academies;

Graduates of schools, colleges, universities, and officers’ training camps, where they have received military instruction under the supervision of an officer of the armed forces on active duty who certified their fitness for appointment as commissioned officers;

For the technical branches or staff corps and departments, such other civilians as may be specially qualified for duty therein; and

Or otherwise, as the above classes shall be changed or altered by the laws of the United States and the regulations issued thereunder.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 57; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-11

.

30-3-12.
Oath of officers.

Commissioned and warrant officers of the national guard shall take and subscribe to the oath of office prescribed by the laws of the United States and any other oath prescribed by the laws of the United States, the governor, or the law of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 58; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-12

.

30-3-13.
Previous military experience of officers — Retirement — Vacancies.

All commissioned officers of the staff corps and departments, hereafter appointed, shall have had previous military experience, except chaplains, officers of the judge advocate general’s corps, and medical corps officers. They shall hold their positions until they shall have reached the age of sixty (60) years, unless retired prior to that time by reason of resignation or disability, or for cause to be determined by an efficiency board or a court-martial legally convened for that purpose. Vacancies among these officers shall be filled by appointment from the commissioned officers of the national guard or from such other civilians as may be specifically qualified for duty therein.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 59; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-13

.

30-3-14.
Qualifications of medical officers, judge advocates, and chaplains.

In the national guard, all commissioned officers of the medical corps must be physicians or surgeons licensed to practice in any state or the District of Columbia in the United States of America; all commissioned officers of the judge advocate general’s department must comply with the provisions of Article II, Rule 2(d) of the Rhode Island Supreme Court Rules; all chaplains must be regularly ordained ministers of the gospel, and any provision as to prior military service shall not apply to these officers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 60; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-14

; P.L. 1989, ch. 206, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 90, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 92, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 111, § 1.

30-3-15.
Qualifications of warrant officers.

The governor will be the judge as to the character and professional qualifications of an applicant for appointment as warrant officer. The standards of physical examination will be the same as for officers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 61; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-15

.

30-3-16.
Resignation of officers.

Resignations of commissioned offices or warrant officers of the national guard shall be in writing and directed to the adjutant general and transmitted through and by all intermediate commanders, who shall indorse the resignations with their approval or disapproval, and shall not be effective until accepted by the governor. No officer shall be permitted to resign his or her commission who shall be under arrest, or against whom charges have been preferred; and no resignation shall be accepted until the officer tendering the resignation shall have furnished to the adjutant general satisfactory evidence that he or she has delivered all moneys in his or her hands as an officer, and all books and other property of the state or of the United States in his or her possession, to his or her next superior or inferior officer, authorized by law to receive them, and that his accounts for money or public property are correct, and that he or she is not indebted to the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 62; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-16

.

30-3-17.
Uniforms and equipment of officers.

Every commissioned officer and every warrant officer of the national guard shall provide himself or herself with the arms, uniforms, and equipment prescribed and approved by the governor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 63; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-17

; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 28.

30-3-18.
Allowances for guard officers.

Every commissioned officer and every warrant officer of the national guard, upon original appointment and upon receipt of federal recognition, may be allowed and paid the sum of seventy-five dollars ($75.00) upon the actual procurement by him or her of the prescribed arms, uniforms, and equipment, and every commissioned officer and every warrant officer of the national guard who shall, in a twelve-month (12) period immediately preceding the first day of May in each year, have maintained and kept his or her prescribed arms, uniforms, and equipment in proper order, may annually, on the first day of May, be allowed and paid the sum of seventy-five dollars ($75.00) or a proportionately less sum for any less period of time. The above sums shall be paid out of the appropriation for the support of the national guard upon the approval of the adjutant general, and upon his or her certification and certification by the intermediate commanders of the organizations that these officers have complied with the requirements of this section; provided, however, that when the national guard is in the active military service of the United States the provisions hereof, where applicable, shall apply to the commissioned officers and warrant officers of the Rhode Island state guard.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 63; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-18

; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 28, § 1.

30-3-19.
Allowances for staff officers.

Each member of the staff of the commander-in-chief provided for in §

30-2-2

shall be allowed and paid the sum of one hundred dollars ($100) upon the actual procurement by him or her of the arms, uniform, and equipment prescribed and every staff member who shall, in a twelve-month (12) period immediately preceding the first day of May in each year, have maintained and kept his or her prescribed arms, uniform, and equipment in proper order, shall annually, on the first day of May, be allowed and paid in addition to the sum set forth in §

30-3-18

, the sum of one hundred dollars ($100) or a proportionately less sum for any less period of time. The above sum shall be paid out of the appropriation for the support of the national guard upon the approval of the adjutant general and upon his or her certification that these members have complied with the requirements of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 63; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-19

.

30-3-20.
Relative rank of officers.

The date of the appointment of a commissioned officer of the national guard shall be expressed in his or her commission and shall be considered as the date thereof. Commissioned officers shall rank according to the date of their commissions. Between officers of the same grade and date of appointment, where there has been no previous military service, the relative rank shall be determined by age, the elder taking precedence. When two (2) officers of the same grade are commissioned as of the same date, their rank shall be determined first, by the length of previous service as a commissioned officer, second, by age, the elder taking precedence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 64; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-20

.

30-3-21.
Efficiency boards.

The capacity and general fitness for service of any commissioned officer or warrant officer of the national guard, may be investigated by an efficiency board. The board shall be appointed by the governor and shall consist of three (3) commissioned officers of the national guard senior in rank, when possible, to the officer under investigation. If the findings of the board be unfavorable to the officer under investigation and are approved by the governor, he or she shall be discharged from the national guard, subject to the provisions of §

30-3-39

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 65; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-21

.

30-3-22.
Physical fitness boards.

The physical fitness for service of commissioned officers or warrant officers of the national guard shall be determined by a board of five (5) medical persons, who shall be appointed by the governor for that purpose. Two (2) of the medical persons shall be selected by the governor and two (2) shall be selected by the officer under examination. The four (4) medical persons shall select a fifth medical person. The officer shall submit his or her selections to the governor within ten (10) days of receipt of notice that he or she is to be examined for physical fitness. Failure of the officer to submit his or her selections to the governor within the prescribed period of time shall be deemed to have been a waiver of his or her rights and the governor shall select the remaining members of the examining board. The findings and recommendations of the board shall be transmitted to the governor. If the officer is found to be physically unfit for service by a majority vote of the examining board, and the finding is approved by the governor, the officer shall be discharged from the national guard, subject to the provisions of §

30-3-39

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 66; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-22

; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 28.

30-3-23.
Dismissal of officers.

No commissioned officer of the national guard shall be dismissed from the service, except by reason of a sentence of dismissal of a general court-martial, which sentence is approved by the governor. No warrant officer of the national guard shall be dismissed from the service except by reason of a sentence of dismissal of a general court-martial or a special court-martial, which sentence is approved by the governor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 67; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-23

.

30-3-24.
Discharge of officers.

A commissioned officer or warrant officer of the national guard may be discharged and his or her commission or warrant terminated, by reason of death; by acceptance by proper authority of resignation; on account of inefficiency; on account of physical disability; absence without leave for three (3) months; dismissal pursuant to sentence of a general court-martial or special court-martial; removal from the state; and upon disbandment of an organization, withdrawal of federal recognition, and for such other reasons as may be prescribed by the governor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 68; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-24

.

30-3-25.
Revocation of commission or warrant — Right to trial by court-martial.

The governor may revoke and cancel the commission of any commissioned officer or the warrant of any warrant officers in his or her discretion. The revocation and cancellation shall not be effectual if, within ten (10) days after receiving notice thereof, the officer shall demand of his or her immediate superior to be informed of the cause thereof and to be tried by a court-martial. If this demand is made, the officer on whom it is made shall transmit the demand to the governor who shall give the officer the required information and order that charges be duly preferred and that a court-martial be convened to try the charges.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 69; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-25

.

30-3-26.
Unassigned list of officers.

The adjutant general shall maintain a list to be known as the unassigned list. A commissioned officer or warrant officer of the national guard may be transferred to the unassigned list:

Pending the acceptance of his or her resignation;

If the officer shall have been absent without leave for over three (3) months;

If the officer shall fail to maintain his or her qualifications for federal recognition;

Pending reassignment after disbandment of organization; and

For such other reasons as may be established by the governor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 70; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-26

.

30-3-27.
Qualifications of enlisted persons.

Hereafter the qualifications for enlistment and reenlistment in the national guard; period or periods of enlistment; form of enlistment contract to be signed; and oath of enlistment to be subscribed to; shall be as provided by the laws of the United States and the regulations pertaining to the national guard, and of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 80; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-27

.

30-3-28.
Transfer of enlisted persons.

Enlisted persons in the national guard may be transferred to or from units, organizations, departments, corps, and detachments, or otherwise, as provided under the laws and regulations of the United States pertaining to the national guard.

In each case of transfer, the office of the adjutant general must be notified, in writing, by the officer granting the transfer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 81; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-28

.

30-3-29.
Means of separation of enlisted persons.

The separation from the service of an enlisted person of the national guard is effected by death or by discharge by proper authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 82; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-29

.

30-3-30.
Causes for discharge of enlisted persons.

Causes for the discharge of enlisted persons of the national guard are as enumerated under the laws of the United States, and the regulations pertaining to the national guard, and for such other reason as the governor deems adequate, satisfactory, and for the best interests of the service.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 83; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-30

.

30-3-31.
Dishonorable discharge of enlisted persons.

No enlisted person of the national guard shall be dishonorably discharged from the service except by reason of a sentence of a general court-martial or a special court-martial, which sentence is approved by the governor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 84; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-31

.

30-3-32.
Form of discharge of enlisted persons — Discharge prior to expiration of enlistment.

An enlisted person discharged from service in the national guard shall receive a discharge, in writing, in such form and with such classification as is, or shall be, prescribed by the laws of the United States. In time of peace, discharges may be given prior to the expiration of terms of enlistments under such regulations as the Secretary of Defense may prescribe.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 85; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-32

.

30-3-33.
Promotion and reduction of enlisted persons.

The appointment of noncommissioned officers, privates first class, and specialists, in the national guard, and their reductions, shall be made as provided by the laws of the United States and the regulations pertaining to the national guard and of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 86; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-33

.

30-3-34.
Detail of retired enlisted persons to duty.

In time of war or other emergency or imminent danger thereof, the governor may detail retired enlisted persons to active duty and, on conclusion of the emergency, return them to the retired list.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 87; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-34

.

30-3-35.
Oath of enlistment — False statements.

Any federally recognized commissioned officer of the national guard of Rhode Island may administer the oath of enlistment to enlisted persons of the national guard, either within or without the state. A person making oath to any willfully false statement contained in the enlistment contract shall be deemed guilty of perjury and punished as for a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 88; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-35

.

30-3-36.
Retirement or discharge of national guard at maximum age.

When an enlisted person of the national guard attains age sixty (60), he or she shall be retired from active service or discharged.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 89; G.L. 1956, §

30-3-36

; P.L. 1965, ch. 71, § 1.

30-3-37.
Retirement of enlisted persons.

Any enlisted person who shall have served in the national guard for fifteen (15) years may, upon his or her own application to the commander-in-chief, be placed upon the retired list of enlisted persons and withdrawn from active service; provided, however, that if an enlisted person served in active federal service during World War I, World War II or the Korean Emergency and enlisted in the national guard within six (6) months from the time of discharge from active federal service, that person shall be entitled to have the intervening period counted as state service for the purposes of this section.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-3-37

; P.L. 1965, ch. 71, § 1.

30-3-38.
Retirement of officers.

Every commissioned officer or warrant officer of the national guard shall, upon reaching the age of retirement as provided by the laws of the United States, be placed on the retired list with the rank held by him or her at the time of retirement.

Any commissioned officer of the national guard who shall have served in the militia of the state for ten (10) years, or who shall have served as an enlisted person or officer for thirteen (13) years, may, upon his or her own application to the commander-in-chief, be placed upon the list of retired officers and withdrawn from active service with the highest rank held by that officer.

In computing the time necessary for retirement, officers shall be credited for all service in the United States Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, and Coast Guard, and the Rhode Island state guard in time of war.

These officers shall be borne on the rolls of the national guard and, during any emergency, may be placed on duty by the governor.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-3-38

; P.L. 1965, ch. 71, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 327, § 1.

30-3-39.
Disability retirement.

Any commissioned officer, warrant officer, or enlisted person, of the national guard, physically disabled in the line of duty, may upon his or her own application to the commander-in-chief, be placed upon the retired list and withdrawn from active service with the highest rank to which he or she has attained.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-3-39

; P.L. 1965, ch. 71, § 1.

30-3-40.
Entitlement to educational benefits.

Any person who is an active member of the Rhode Island national guard and who is enrolled in, or otherwise eligible to attend, any college or university in Rhode Island and who is not eligible to receive Veterans Administration educational benefits, shall be entitled to an educational benefit amounting to fifty percent (50%) of each semester’s basic tuition or general fee charges, under such provisions as the adjutant general may determine.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 179, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 319, § 1.

30-3-40.1.
Limitations and distribution of educational benefits.

Educational benefits supported by state funds shall be limited in the aggregate to the amount hereafter appropriated, or as much thereof as the general assembly may annually appropriate, and distribution of funds in support of educational benefits for national guard members shall be made to any college or university in Rhode Island by the adjutant general on behalf of eligible members on the basis of order of dates in which benefit applications are received in the office of the adjutant general. To carry out the provisions of this section and §

30-3-40

, the general assembly shall annually appropriate the sum of thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) and the state controller is hereby authorized to draw his or her orders upon the state treasurer for the payment of this sum upon the presentation of properly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 179, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 319, § 1.

30-3-40.2.
Termination of educational benefits.

In the event of a resumption of a national system of selective service, the provisions of §§

30-3-40

and

30-3-40

.1 shall be terminated within a period of twelve (12) months of the effective date of this selective service and no further state funds shall be appropriated for educational benefits of Rhode Island national guard members, except for those guard members then in attendance under the terms of §§ 30-3-40 and

30-3-40.1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 179, § 3; P.L. 1980, ch. 319, § 2.

30-3-40.3.
Educational benefits for National Guard members.

Any person who is an active member in good standing of the Rhode Island national guard, and who is eligible to attend at any state college or university in Rhode Island, will be eligible for a tuition assistance educational benefit amounting to five (5) courses per semester at any Rhode Island state college or university. Basic tuition or general fee charges to be waived for said five (5) courses. Each of the state colleges or universities shall receive an equal share of the educational account funding for Rhode Island national guard members, the account to be administered by the office of the adjutant general. The exact amount for each institution shall be determined by the board of governors. The total amount of funds in the education account shall not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in any fiscal year.

In order to be eligible for tuition waivers, a person must remain a member in good standing in the Rhode Island national guard and a student in good standing at any state college or university. A member in good standing is defined as any soldier or airperson of the Rhode Island national guard who is currently satisfactorily participating in all unit training assemblies and annual training periods, as so certified by the adjutant general.

Those guard members wishing to participate in this program must enter into a contractual enlistment commitment that provides for one year of obligated service in the Rhode Island national guard for each twelve (12) course credits or four (4) three-credit (3) courses where the soldier’s or airperson’s tuition will be waived. Such assistance shall be available for courses creditable to associate, bachelor’s, or master’s degrees. Failure to satisfactorily fulfill the service obligation incurred in return for tuition assistance will require the participant to repay a pro-rata share of said assistance. This obligation shall be considered to be a debt owed to the state and may be satisfied by offset against any state transfer payments or state income tax refunds. The participating member shall reimburse the Rhode Island national guard when any of the following occur: the soldier fails to participate satisfactorily as a member of the Rhode Island national guard; the soldier withdraws from, or fails to complete, a course for personal reasons; the soldier fails to make up an incomplete grade within time limits stipulated by the institution or one hundred twenty (120) days after the completion of the class, whichever occurs first; or the soldier fails to provide the adjutant general a copy of the grade report within thirty (30) days of course completion and may be subject to punishment under the Rhode Island military code.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 275, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 100; P.L. 1999, ch. 155, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 251, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 209, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 284, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 302, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 9, § 1.

30-3-40.4.
Payment of life insurance premiums.

Any member of the national guard who has been mobilized in excess of thirty (30) days and who elects coverage under a term life insurance policy issued by the federal government, shall be reimbursed from the general fund for the cost of premiums incurred by the member for said policy for any month or part thereof that the member has been mobilized. In the event that a member of the national guard elects coverage in an amount in excess of four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) under such policy, the member shall receive reimbursement from the general fund in an amount not to exceed the amount of the premiums attributable to the first four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) of coverage under said policy.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 20, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 560, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 567, § 1.

Applicability.

P.L. 2006, ch. 567, § 2, provides that the amendment to this section by that act takes effect upon passage [July 10, 2006] and shall be applied retroactively to October 1, 2005.

30-3-40.5.
Tuition to children of National Guard members dying as a result of service.

If an active member of the Rhode Island national guard is killed or dies while in the performance of his or her duty as a member, there shall be paid out of the general fund of the state of Rhode Island the charges for the tuition of children of the deceased member and/or the spouse of the member killed in the line of duty. The benefits are extended to the children and/or spouse who are attending or may attend the University of Rhode Island, Rhode Island College, or any other college or university operated by the state; provided, that the child has entered the institution while between the ages of sixteen (16) and twenty-one (21); and provided, further, that the aid granted is available to the child and/or spouse for the period of time that may equal the normal time for completing the courses regularly offered by the institution, but in no case more than four (4) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 300, § 1.

30-3-41.
The Rhode Island Military Family Relief Fund.

There is hereby created the Rhode Island military family relief fund. The purpose of this fund shall be to aid family members of the Rhode Island National Guard and military force reservists and members of the active duty military with either a home of record or military service point of entry being in the State of Rhode Island.

In addition to funds deposited by the general treasurer in accordance with §

44-30-2.9

, the adjutant general is authorized to accept any grant, devise, bequest, donation, gift, services in kind, assignment of money, binds or other valuable securities, or moneys appropriated by the general assembly for deposit in and credit of the fund.

The Rhode Island military family relief fund shall be administered by the adjutant general or the adjutant general’s designated representative. The adjutant general shall establish criteria pertaining to eligibility for fund assistance. The funds will be distributed at the discretion of the adjutant general and in accordance with the established criteria to the families of the national guard or military force reservists and members of the active duty military with either a home of record or military service point of entry being in the State of Rhode Island. The criteria for distribution and disbursement shall be established in accordance with chapter 35 of title 42, the “administrative procedures act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 261, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 347, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 180, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 300, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 385, § 1.